Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-117 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, the term "unlawfully operating a
motor vehicle" means driving without a valid Oklahoma or reciprocal-
state license, or driving with a suspended, revoked, or cancelled
license, or using fraudulent identification.
B. No first-party liability insurance claims shall be paid to a
driver who was unlawfully operating a motor vehicle at the time of
the loss.
Req. No. 14368 Page 1

C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that:
1. Third-parties may not collect compensation for injuries or
property damage; or
2. Passengers or other nondrivers may not collect compensation
for injuries or property damage.
D. Insurers may rely on official Department of Public Safety
license status data for determining whether a claimant was
unlawfully operating a motor vehicle at the time of loss.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14368 MJ 01/05/26













Req. No. 14368 Page 2